Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.214

Appeal from rejected bond claim.

Upon any bond claim being denied by the director the claimant must appeal such action to the superior court in the county where this claimant resides in this state or Thurston county, within sixty days after receipt of written notice of such rejection or such rejection shall become final and binding upon the claimant.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 10; 1963 c 232 s 7.]